Arkansas, session 2025, SB382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-5-1110 is repealed.
15-5-1110. Financial report of Capital Access Fund.
(a) At least annually, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority
shall prepare a report conforming to generally accepted accounting principles
that describes the financial condition of the Capital Access Fund and
describes the results and economic impact of the Arkansas Capital Access
Program for Small Business and the Arkansas Credit Reserve Program.
(b) The reports required under this section shall be submitted to the
Governor and to the Legislative Council.





*JLL211*
03/05/2025 9:59:08 AM JLL211